Washington statutes.
RCW 18.30.140

Inactive licenses.

(1) An individual may place his or her license on inactive status. The holder of an inactive license shall not practice denturism in this state without first activating the license.

(2) An inactive license may be placed in an active status upon compliance with rules established by the board.

(3) The provisions relating to denial, suspension, and revocation of a license are applicable to an inactive license, except that when proceedings to suspend or revoke an inactive license have been initiated, the license shall remain inactive until the proceedings have been completed.

[ 2002 c 160 s 8; 1995 c 198 s 24; 1995 c 1 s 15 (Initiative Measure No. 607, approved November 8, 1994).]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 198 ss 18-25: See note following RCW 18.30.020.